static/hunspell/03.01.2024/bash.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY -абвгғдҙеёжзийкҡлмнңоөпрсҫтуүфхһцчшщъыьэәюяАБВГҒДҘЕЁЖЗИЙКҠЛМНҢОӨПРСҪТУҮФХҺЦЧШЩЪЫЬЭӘЮЯ

REP 0

FLAG long

WORDCHARS -

SFX A01 Y 70 # прилагательные A
SFX A01 0 дар/O01 [^ь]	+Pl
SFX A01 ь дар/O01 [ь]	+Pl
SFX A01 0 дың/O03 [^ь]	+Gen
SFX A01 ь дың/O03 [ь]	+Gen
SFX A01 0 ға/O07 [^ь]	+Dat
SFX A01 ь ға/O07 [ь]	+Dat
SFX A01 0 ды/O07 [^ь]	+Acc
SFX A01 ь ды/O07 [ь]	+Acc
SFX A01 0 дан/O03 [^ь]	+Abl
SFX A01 ь дан/O03 [ь]	+Abl
SFX A01 0 да/O07 [^ь]	+Loc
SFX A01 ь да/O07 [ь]	+Loc
SFX A01 0 мын/O12 [^ь]	+Pred1Sg
SFX A01 ь мын/O12 [ь]	+Pred1Sg
SFX A01 0 һың/O12 [^ь]	+Pred2Sg
SFX A01 ь һың/O12 [ь]	+Pred2Sg
SFX A01 0 быҙ/O16 [^ь]	+Pred1Pl
SFX A01 ь быҙ/O16 [ь]	+Pred1Pl
SFX A01 0 һығыҙ/O16 [^ь]	+Pred2Pl
SFX A01 ь һығыҙ/O16 [ь]	+Pred2Pl
SFX A01 0 0/U01 [^ь]	
SFX A01 ь 0/U01 [ь]	
SFX A01 0 мы [^ь]	+Q
SFX A01 ь мы [ь]	+Q
SFX A01 0 мылыр [^ь]	+Q+Indf
SFX A01 ь мылыр [ь]	+Q+Indf
SFX A01 0 дыр [^ь]	+Indf
SFX A01 ь дыр [ь]	+Indf
SFX A01 0 сы [^ь]	+Clt/сы
SFX A01 ь сы [ь]	+Clt/сы
SFX A01 0 дыҡы/O38 [^ь]	+Poss
SFX A01 ь дыҡы/O38 [ь]	+Poss
SFX A01 0 ҡай/O42 [^ь]	+Dim
SFX A01 ь ҡай/O42 [ь]	+Dim
SFX A01 0 дай/O44 [^ь]	+Der/дай
SFX A01 ь дай/O44 [ь]	+Der/дай
SFX A01 0 са/O46 [^ь]	+Der/са
SFX A01 ь са/O46 [ь]	+Der/са
SFX A01 0 дағы/O48 [^ь]	+Der/дағы
SFX A01 ь дағы/O48 [ь]	+Der/дағы
SFX A01 0 лы/O50 [^ь]	+Der/лы
SFX A01 ь лы/O50 [ь]	+Der/лы
SFX A01 0 һыҙ/O54 [^ь]	+Abe
SFX A01 ь һыҙ/O54 [ь]	+Abe
SFX A01 0 ғаса/O58 [^ь]	+Der/ҡаса
SFX A01 ь ғаса/O58 [ь]	+Der/ҡаса
SFX A01 0 ыраҡ .	+Comp
SFX A01 0 ыраҡтар/O01 .	+Comp+Pl
SFX A01 0 ыраҡтың/O03 .	+Comp+Gen
SFX A01 0 ыраҡҡа/O07 .	+Comp+Dat
SFX A01 0 ыраҡты/O07 .	+Comp+Acc
SFX A01 0 ыраҡтан/O03 .	+Comp+Abl
SFX A01 0 ыраҡта/O07 .	+Comp+Loc
SFX A01 0 ыраҡмын/O12 .	+Comp+Pred1Sg
SFX A01 0 ыраҡһың/O12 .	+Comp+Pred2Sg
SFX A01 0 ыраҡбыҙ/O16 .	+Comp+Pred1Pl
SFX A01 0 ыраҡһығыҙ/O16 .	+Comp+Pred2Pl
SFX A01 0 ыраҡ/U22 .	+Comp
SFX A01 0 ыраҡмы .	+Comp+Q
SFX A01 0 ыраҡмылыр .	+Comp+Q+Indf
SFX A01 0 ыраҡтыр .	+Comp+Indf
SFX A01 0 ыраҡсы .	+Comp+Clt/сы
SFX A01 0 ыраҡтыҡы/O38 .	+Comp+Poss
SFX A01 0 ыраҡҡай/O42 .	+Comp+Dim
SFX A01 0 ыраҡтай/O44 .	+Comp+Der/дай
SFX A01 0 ыраҡса/O46 .	+Comp+Der/са
SFX A01 0 ыраҡтағы/O48 .	+Comp+Der/дағы
SFX A01 0 ыраҡлы/O50 .	+Comp+Der/лы
SFX A01 0 ыраҡһыҙ/O54 .	+Comp+Abe
SFX A01 0 ыраҡҡаса/O58 .	+Comp+Der/ҡаса

SFX A02 Y 70 # прилагательные A
SFX A02 0 дәр/O02 [^ь]	+Pl
SFX A02 ь дәр/O02 [ь]	+Pl
SFX A02 0 дең/O04 [^ь]	+Gen
SFX A02 ь дең/O04 [ь]	+Gen
SFX A02 0 гә/O08 [^ь]	+Dat
SFX A02 ь гә/O08 [ь]	+Dat
SFX A02 0 де/O08 [^ь]	+Acc
SFX A02 ь де/O08 [ь]	+Acc
SFX A02 0 дән/O04 [^ь]	+Abl
SFX A02 ь дән/O04 [ь]	+Abl
SFX A02 0 дә/O08 [^ь]	+Loc
SFX A02 ь дә/O08 [ь]	+Loc
SFX A02 0 мен/O13 [^ь]	+Pred1Sg
SFX A02 ь мен/O13 [ь]	+Pred1Sg
SFX A02 0 һең/O13 [^ь]	+Pred2Sg
SFX A02 ь һең/O13 [ь]	+Pred2Sg
SFX A02 0 беҙ/O17 [^ь]	+Pred1Pl
SFX A02 ь беҙ/O17 [ь]	+Pred1Pl
SFX A02 0 һегеҙ/O17 [^ь]	+Pred2Pl
SFX A02 ь һегеҙ/O17 [ь]	+Pred2Pl
SFX A02 0 0/U02 [^ь]	
SFX A02 ь 0/U02 [ь]	
SFX A02 0 ме [^ь]	+Q
SFX A02 ь ме [ь]	+Q
SFX A02 0 мелер [^ь]	+Q+Indf
SFX A02 ь мелер [ь]	+Q+Indf
SFX A02 0 дер [^ь]	+Indf
SFX A02 ь дер [ь]	+Indf
SFX A02 0 се [^ь]	+Clt/сы
SFX A02 ь се [ь]	+Clt/сы
SFX A02 0 деке/O39 [^ь]	+Poss
SFX A02 ь деке/O39 [ь]	+Poss
SFX A02 0 кәй/O43 [^ь]	+Dim
SFX A02 ь кәй/O43 [ь]	+Dim
SFX A02 0 дәй/O45 [^ь]	+Der/дай
SFX A02 ь дәй/O45 [ь]	+Der/дай
SFX A02 0 сә/O47 [^ь]	+Der/са
SFX A02 ь сә/O47 [ь]	+Der/са
SFX A02 0 дәге/O49 [^ь]	+Der/дағы
SFX A02 ь дәге/O49 [ь]	+Der/дағы
SFX A02 0 ле/O51 [^ь]	+Der/лы
SFX A02 ь ле/O51 [ь]	+Der/лы
SFX A02 0 һеҙ/O55 [^ь]	+Abe
SFX A02 ь һеҙ/O55 [ь]	+Abe
SFX A02 0 гәсә/O59 [^ь]	+Der/ҡаса
SFX A02 ь гәсә/O59 [ь]	+Der/ҡаса
SFX A02 0 ерәк .	+Comp
SFX A02 0 ерәктәр/O02 .	+Comp+Pl
SFX A02 0 ерәктең/O04 .	+Comp+Gen
SFX A02 0 ерәккә/O08 .	+Comp+Dat
SFX A02 0 ерәкте/O08 .	+Comp+Acc
SFX A02 0 ерәктән/O04 .	+Comp+Abl
SFX A02 0 ерәктә/O08 .	+Comp+Loc
SFX A02 0 ерәкмен/O13 .	+Comp+Pred1Sg
SFX A02 0 ерәкһең/O13 .	+Comp+Pred2Sg
SFX A02 0 ерәкбеҙ/O17 .	+Comp+Pred1Pl
SFX A02 0 ерәкһегеҙ/O17 .	+Comp+Pred2Pl
SFX A02 0 ерәк/U24 .	+Comp
SFX A02 0 ерәкме .	+Comp+Q
SFX A02 0 ерәкмелер .	+Comp+Q+Indf
SFX A02 0 ерәктер .	+Comp+Indf
SFX A02 0 ерәксе .	+Comp+Clt/сы
SFX A02 0 ерәктеке/O39 .	+Comp+Poss
SFX A02 0 ерәккәй/O43 .	+Comp+Dim
SFX A02 0 ерәктәй/O45 .	+Comp+Der/дай
SFX A02 0 ерәксә/O47 .	+Comp+Der/са
SFX A02 0 ерәктәге/O49 .	+Comp+Der/дағы
SFX A02 0 ерәкле/O51 .	+Comp+Der/лы
SFX A02 0 ерәкһеҙ/O55 .	+Comp+Abe
SFX A02 0 ерәккәсә/O59 .	+Comp+Der/ҡаса

SFX A03 Y 47 # прилагательные A
SFX A03 0 дар/O01 .	+Pl
SFX A03 0 доң/O05 .	+Gen
SFX A03 0 ға/O07 .	+Dat
SFX A03 0 до/O09 .	+Acc
SFX A03 0 дан/O03 .	+Abl
SFX A03 0 да/O07 .	+Loc
SFX A03 0 мон/O14 .	+Pred1Sg
SFX A03 0 һоң/O14 .	+Pred2Sg
SFX A03 0 боҙ/O18 .	+Pred1Pl
SFX A03 0 һоғоҙ/O18 .	+Pred2Pl
SFX A03 0 0/U03 .	
SFX A03 0 мо .	+Q
SFX A03 0 молор .	+Q+Indf
SFX A03 0 дор .	+Indf
SFX A03 0 со .	+Clt/сы
SFX A03 0 доҡо/O40 .	+Poss
SFX A03 0 ҡай/O42 .	+Dim
SFX A03 0 дай/O44 .	+Der/дай
SFX A03 0 са/O46 .	+Der/са
SFX A03 0 дағы/O48 .	+Der/дағы
SFX A03 0 ло/O52 .	+Der/лы
SFX A03 0 һоҙ/O56 .	+Abe
SFX A03 0 ғаса/O58 .	+Der/ҡаса
SFX A03 0 ораҡ .	+Comp
SFX A03 0 ораҡтар/O01 .	+Comp+Pl
SFX A03 0 ораҡтың/O03 .	+Comp+Gen
SFX A03 0 ораҡҡа/O07 .	+Comp+Dat
SFX A03 0 ораҡты/O07 .	+Comp+Acc
SFX A03 0 ораҡтан/O03 .	+Comp+Abl
SFX A03 0 ораҡта/O07 .	+Comp+Loc
SFX A03 0 ораҡмын/O12 .	+Comp+Pred1Sg
SFX A03 0 ораҡһың/O12 .	+Comp+Pred2Sg
SFX A03 0 ораҡбыҙ/O16 .	+Comp+Pred1Pl
SFX A03 0 ораҡһығыҙ/O16 .	+Comp+Pred2Pl
SFX A03 0 ораҡ/U22 .	+Comp
SFX A03 0 ораҡмы .	+Comp+Q
SFX A03 0 ораҡмылыр .	+Comp+Q+Indf
SFX A03 0 ораҡтыр .	+Comp+Indf
SFX A03 0 ораҡсы .	+Comp+Clt/сы
SFX A03 0 ораҡтыҡы/O38 .	+Comp+Poss
SFX A03 0 ораҡҡай/O42 .	+Comp+Dim
SFX A03 0 ораҡтай/O44 .	+Comp+Der/дай
SFX A03 0 ораҡса/O46 .	+Comp+Der/са
SFX A03 0 ораҡтағы/O48 .	+Comp+Der/дағы
SFX A03 0 ораҡлы/O50 .	+Comp+Der/лы
SFX A03 0 ораҡһыҙ/O54 .	+Comp+Abe
SFX A03 0 ораҡҡаса/O58 .	+Comp+Der/ҡаса

SFX A04 Y 47 # прилагательные A
SFX A04 0 дәр/O02 .	+Pl
SFX A04 0 дөң/O06 .	+Gen
SFX A04 0 гә/O08 .	+Dat
SFX A04 0 дө/O10 .	+Acc
SFX A04 0 дән/O04 .	+Abl
SFX A04 0 дә/O08 .	+Loc
SFX A04 0 мөн/O15 .	+Pred1Sg
SFX A04 0 һөң/O15 .	+Pred2Sg
SFX A04 0 бөҙ/O19 .	+Pred1Pl
SFX A04 0 һөгөҙ/O19 .	+Pred2Pl
SFX A04 0 O/U04 .	
SFX A04 0 мө .	+Q
SFX A04 0 мөлөр .	+Q+Indf
SFX A04 0 дөр .	+Indf
SFX A04 0 сө .	+Clt/сы
SFX A04 0 дөкө/O41 .	+Poss
SFX A04 0 кәй/O43 .	+Dim
SFX A04 0 дәй/O45 .	+Der/дай
SFX A04 0 сә/O47 .	+Der/са
SFX A04 0 дәге/O49 .	+Der/дағы
SFX A04 0 лө/O53 .	+Der/лы
SFX A04 0 һөҙ/O57 .	+Abe
SFX A04 0 гәсә/O59 .	+Der/ҡаса
SFX A04 0 өрәк .	+Comp
SFX A04 0 өрәктәр/O02 .	+Comp+Pl
SFX A04 0 өрәктең/O04 .	+Comp+Gen
SFX A04 0 өрәккә/O08 .	+Comp+Dat
SFX A04 0 өрәкте/O08 .	+Comp+Acc
SFX A04 0 өрәктән/O04 .	+Comp+Abl
SFX A04 0 өрәктә/O08 .	+Comp+Loc
SFX A04 0 өрәкмен/O13 .	+Comp+Pred1Sg
SFX A04 0 өрәкһең/O13 .	+Comp+Pred2Sg
SFX A04 0 өрәкбеҙ/O17 .	+Comp+Pred1Pl
SFX A04 0 өрәкһегеҙ/O17 .	+Comp+Pred2Pl
SFX A04 0 өрәк/U24 .	+Comp
SFX A04 0 өрәкме .	+Comp+Q
SFX A04 0 өрәкмелер .	+Comp+Q+Indf
SFX A04 0 өрәктер .	+Comp+Indf
SFX A04 0 өрәксе .	+Comp+Clt/сы
SFX A04 0 өрәктеке/O39 .	+Comp+Poss
SFX A04 0 өрәккәй/O43 .	+Comp+Dim
SFX A04 0 өрәктәй/O45 .	+Comp+Der/дай
SFX A04 0 өрәксә/O47 .	+Comp+Der/са
SFX A04 0 өрәктәге/O49 .	+Comp+Der/дағы
SFX A04 0 өрәкле/O51 .	+Comp+Der/лы
SFX A04 0 өрәкһеҙ/O55 .	+Comp+Abe
SFX A04 0 өрәккәсә/O59 .	+Comp+Der/ҡаса

SFX A05 Y 70 # прилагательные A
SFX A05 0 ҙар/O01 [^ь]	+Pl
SFX A05 ь ҙар/O01 [ь]	+Pl
SFX A05 0 ҙың/O03 [^ь]	+Gen
SFX A05 ь ҙың/O03 [ь]	+Ge
SFX A05 0 ға/O07 [^ь]	+Dat
SFX A05 ь ға/O07 [ь]	+Dat
SFX A05 0 ҙы/O07 [^ь]	+Acc
SFX A05 ь ҙы/O07 [ь]	+Acc
SFX A05 0 ҙан/O03 [^ь]	+Abl
SFX A05 ь ҙан/O03 [ь]	+Abl
SFX A05 0 ҙа/O07 [^ь]	+Loc
SFX A05 ь ҙа/O07 [ь]	+Loc
SFX A05 0 мын/O12 [^ь]	+Pred1Sg
SFX A05 ь мын/O12 [ь]	+Pred1Sg
SFX A05 0 һың/O12 [^ь]	+Pred2Sg
SFX A05 ь һың/O12 [ь]	+Pred2Sg
SFX A05 0 быҙ/O16 [^ь]	+Pred1Pl
SFX A05 ь быҙ/O16 [ь]	+Pred1Pl
SFX A05 0 һығыҙ/O16 [^ь]	+Pred2Pl
SFX A05 ь һығыҙ/O16 [ь]	+Pred2Pl
SFX A05 0 0/U05 [^ь]	
SFX A05 ь 0/U05 [ь]	
SFX A05 0 мы [^ь]	+Q
SFX A05 ь мы [ь]	+Q
SFX A05 0 мылыр [^ь]	+Q+Indf
SFX A05 ь мылыр [ь]	+Q+Indf
SFX A05 0 ҙыр [^ь]	+Indf
SFX A05 ь ҙыр [ь]	+Indf
SFX A05 0 сы [^ь]	+Clt/сы
SFX A05 ь сы [ь]	+Clt/сы
SFX A05 0 ҙыҡы/O38 [^ь]	+Poss
SFX A05 ь ҙыҡы/O38 [ь]	+Poss
SFX A05 0 ҡай/O42 [^ь]	+Dim
SFX A05 ь ҡай/O42 [ь]	+Dim
SFX A05 0 ҙай/O44 [^ь]	+Der/дай
SFX A05 ь ҙай/O44 [ь]	+Der/дай
SFX A05 0 са/O46 [^ь]	+Der/са
SFX A05 ь са/O46 [ь]	+Der/са
SFX A05 0 ҙағы/O48 [^ь]	+Der/дағы
SFX A05 ь ҙағы/O48 [ь]	+Der/дағы
SFX A05 0 лы/O50 [^ь]	+Der/лы
SFX A05 ь лы/O50 [ь]	+Der/лы
SFX A05 0 һыҙ/O54 [^ь]	+Abe
SFX A05 ь һыҙ/O54 [ь]	+Abe
SFX A05 0 ғаса/O58 [^ь]	+Der/ҡаса
SFX A05 ь ғаса/O58 [ь]	+Der/ҡаса
SFX A05 0 ыраҡ .	+Comp
SFX A05 0 ыраҡтар/O01 .	+Comp+Pl
SFX A05 0 ыраҡтың/O03 .	+Comp+Gen
SFX A05 0 ыраҡҡа/O07 .	+Comp+Dat
SFX A05 0 ыраҡты/O07 .	+Comp+Acc
SFX A05 0 ыраҡтан/O03 .	+Comp+Abl
SFX A05 0 ыраҡта/O07 .	+Comp+Loc
SFX A05 0 ыраҡмын/O12 .	+Comp+Pred1Sg
SFX A05 0 ыраҡһың/O12 .	+Comp+Pred2Sg
SFX A05 0 ыраҡбыҙ/O16 .	+Comp+Pred1Pl
SFX A05 0 ыраҡһығыҙ/O16 .	+Comp+Pred2Pl
SFX A05 0 ыраҡ/U22 .	+Comp
SFX A05 0 ыраҡмы .	+Comp+Q
SFX A05 0 ыраҡмылыр .	+Comp+Q+Indf
SFX A05 0 ыраҡтыр .	+Comp+Indf
SFX A05 0 ыраҡсы .	+Comp+Clt/сы
SFX A05 0 ыраҡтыҡы/O38 .	+Comp+Poss
SFX A05 0 ыраҡҡай/O42 .	+Comp+Dim
SFX A05 0 ыраҡтай/O44 .	+Comp+Der/дай
SFX A05 0 ыраҡса/O46 .	+Comp+Der/са
SFX A05 0 ыраҡтағы/O48 .	+Comp+Der/дағы
SFX A05 0 ыраҡлы/O50 .	+Comp+Der/лы
SFX A05 0 ыраҡһыҙ/O54 .	+Comp+Abe
SFX A05 0 ыраҡҡаса/O58 .	+Comp+Der/ҡаса

SFX A06 Y 47 # прилагательные A
SFX A06 0 ҙәр/O02 .	+Pl
SFX A06 0 ҙең/O04 .	+Gen
SFX A06 0 гә/O08 .	+Dat
SFX A06 0 ҙе/O08 .	+Acc
SFX A06 0 ҙән/O04 .	+Abl
SFX A06 0 ҙә/O08 .	+Loc
SFX A06 0 мен/O13 .	+Pred1Sg
SFX A06 0 һең/O13 .	+Pred2Sg
SFX A06 0 беҙ/O17 .	+Pred1Pl
SFX A06 0 һегеҙ/O17 .	+Pred2Pl
SFX A06 0 0/U06 .	
SFX A06 0 ме .	+Q
SFX A06 0 мелер .	+Q+Indf
SFX A06 0 ҙер .	+Indf
SFX A06 0 се .	+Clt/сы
SFX A06 0 ҙеке/O39 .	+Poss
SFX A06 0 кәй/O43 .	+Dim
SFX A06 0 ҙәй/O45 .	+Der/дай
SFX A06 0 сә/O47 .	+Der/са
SFX A06 0 ҙәге/O49 .	+Der/дағы
SFX A06 0 ле/O51 .	+Der/лы
SFX A06 0 һеҙ/O55 .	+Abe
SFX A06 0 гәсә/O59 .	+Der/ҡаса
SFX A06 0 ерәк .	+Comp
SFX A06 0 ерәктәр/O02 .	+Comp+Pl
SFX A06 0 ерәктең/O04 .	+Comp+Gen
SFX A06 0 ерәккә/O08 .	+Comp+Dat
SFX A06 0 ерәкте/O08 .	+Comp+Acc
SFX A06 0 ерәктән/O04 .	+Comp+Abl
SFX A06 0 ерәктә/O08 .	+Comp+Loc
SFX A06 0 ерәкмен/O13 .	+Comp+Pred1Sg
SFX A06 0 ерәкһең/O13 .	+Comp+Pred2Sg
SFX A06 0 ерәкбеҙ/O17 .	+Comp+Pred1Pl
SFX A06 0 ерәкһегеҙ/O17 .	+Comp+Pred2Pl
SFX A06 0 ерәк/U24 .	+Comp
SFX A06 0 ерәкме .	+Comp+Q
SFX A06 0 ерәкмелер .	+Comp+Q+Indf
SFX A06 0 ерәктер .	+Comp+Indf
SFX A06 0 ерәксе .	+Comp+Clt/сы
SFX A06 0 ерәктеке/O39 .	+Comp+Poss
SFX A06 0 ерәккәй/O43 .	+Comp+Dim
SFX A06 0 ерәктәй/O45 .	+Comp+Der/дай
SFX A06 0 ерәксә/O47 .	+Comp+Der/са
SFX A06 0 ерәктәге/O49 .	+Comp+Der/дағы
SFX A06 0 ерәкле/O51 .	+Comp+Der/лы
SFX A06 0 ерәкһеҙ/O55 .	+Comp+Abe
SFX A06 0 ерәккәсә/O59 .	+Comp+Der/ҡаса
